Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.026

Surveys—Applicability by county—Electronic option.

(1) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW 39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data collected by the department of labor and industries may be used only in the county for which the work was performed.

(2) The department of labor and industries must provide registered contractors with the option of completing a wage survey electronically.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 40 s 2; 2003 c 363 s 206.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 39.04.320.

Findings—Intent—2003 c 363 ss 201-206: See note following RCW 49.04.141.

Part headings not law—Severability—2003 c 363: See notes following RCW 47.28.241.